Massachusetts, session 194th, H2850.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 94 B of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2000 Official 
Edition is hereby amended by adding the words "police department" after the word department in 
line 5.